Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 1. Board of Civil Authority

§ 801.
Composition; meetings.

The town clerk, selectboard members and justices residing in a town shall constitute the board of civil authority of such town. Meetings of the board shall be called by the town clerk, or by one of the selectboard members, on application, by giving written notice to each member, and by posting a notice in two or more public places in the town at least five days previous to the meeting.
The board shall choose a chair, and the town clerk shall be its clerk.
The act of a majority of the board present at the meeting shall be treated as the act of the board, except that when the board is dealing with election issues,

17 V.S.A. § 2103(5)

shall control.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 118.